Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General

§§ 19-13-1 through 19-13-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§19-13-1. [Codes, 1871, § 1392; 1880, § 2181; 1892, § 343; 1906, § 364; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3737; 1930, § 242; 1942, § 2920]

§19-3-3. [Codes, 1930, § 243; 1942, § 2921; Laws, 1924, ch. 234; Laws, 1972, ch. 452, § 1]

§19-13-5. [Codes, 1930, § 244; 1942, § 2922; Laws, 1924, ch. 234]

§19-13-7. [Codes, 1930, § 245; 1942, § 2923; Laws, 1924, ch. 234]

§ 19-13-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Codes, 1871, § 1388; 1880, §§ 2179, 2180; 1892, §§ 340,341; 1906, §§ 361, 362; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3734, 3735;1930, §§ 239, 240; 1942, §§ 2917, 2918; Laws, 1904, ch. 141; Laws, 1975, ch. 343; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 12]

§ 19-13-11.
Contracts not to be made in vacation; approval.

A board of supervisors shall not empower or authorize any one or more members of such board, or other person, to let or make contract for the building or erection of public works of any description, or for working public roads, in vacation or during a recess of said board, except as provided in Title 65 of the Mississippi Code of 1972 in cases of emergency when a bridge or road has been or is about to be damaged by floods or otherwise, and in other special cases. All other contracts shall be made and approved by said board in open session, and it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to accept the lowest responsible bid for the erection or construction of all public buildings, bridges or public works, or for the execution of any other contract. Any bidder will be deemed responsible who will enter into bond, with sufficient sureties, according to law, to be approved by said board, in double the amount of the bids made by such bidder for the prompt, proper and efficient performance of his contract. All contracts made in violation of any of the provisions of law shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1394; 1880, § 2183; 1892, § 344; 1906, § 369; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3742; 1930, § 246; 1942, § 2924.

§ 19-13-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Codes, 1942, § 2917.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 301, §§ 1, 2]

§ 19-13-15.
Payment for work not to be made until inspection; partial payments.

[For contracts executed prior to July 1, 1984, the following provisions apply:]

The board of supervisors shall never make a payment to any contractor for building or repairing a bridge, or for doing any work on a public road, public building or other public work, where the contract price exceeds Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) but is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), without first having the same inspected and accepted by a committee, and having the certificate of the committee, under oath filed and entered on the minutes of the board. Such committee shall be appointed by the board of supervisors for that purpose and shall consist of at least two (2) members of the board of other districts than the one in which the work is done. The board shall not be bound by the acceptance of the committee, and shall never pay for the work in such cases until the specifications therefor are complied with and the work completed. In all cases of public work let by the board of supervisors where the contract price exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), the board may contract so as to provide for making partial payments to the contractor therefor as the work progresses. In no case shall the retained amount of such partial payments be less than two and one-half percent (2 1/2 %) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the value of the work done and material used in the performance of the contracts, such value to be estimated by some competent person employed by the board to superintend such work, and not until the superintendent shall furnish to the board such estimate, in writing, on his oath as to the correctness of such estimate, which estimate, with the oath annexed thereto, shall be filed with and recorded in the minutes of the board; provided, however, the amount retained by the prime contractor from each payment due the subcontractor shall not exceed the percentage withheld by the board of supervisors from the prime contractors. Before such person employed by the board shall enter upon the discharge of the duty of supervising such work, and before he shall furnish any estimate as to the value of the work done, he shall enter into bond in such penalty as may be fixed by the board, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, and conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as superintendent of such work, which bond shall be filed and preserved by the board, and shall be liable to suit thereon in the name of the county, for any misfeasance or malfeasance on the part of such superintendent touching the performance of his duties. The board shall not be bound by the estimate of such superintendent, nor shall the making of any partial payments on any public work, as above provided, be construed as an acceptance of the work and materials so inspected by such superintendent. The board shall not make the final payment on any such works or building without first having the same inspected as a whole and accepted by a committee of the board, as hereinbefore provided, and until the specifications are complied with and the work completed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 342; Laws, 1906, § 363; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3736; Laws, 1930, § 241; Laws, 1942, § 2919; Laws, 1904, ch. 141; Laws, 1924 ch. 237; Laws, 1968 ch. 289, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 454, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 406, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984, and shall apply only to contracts executed on or after July 1, 1984.

§ 19-13-15.
Payment for work not to be made until inspection; partial payments.

[For contracts executed on or after July 1, 1984, the following provisions apply:]

The board of supervisors shall never make a payment to any contractor for building or repairing a bridge, or for doing any work on a public road, public building or other public work, where the contract price exceeds Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) but is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), without first having the same inspected and accepted by a committee, and having the certificate of the committee, under oath filed and entered on the minutes of the board. Such committee shall be appointed by the board of supervisors for that purpose and shall consist of at least two (2) members of the board of other districts than the one in which the work is done. The board shall not be bound by the acceptance of the committee, and shall never pay for the work in such cases until the specifications therefor are complied with and the work completed. In all cases of public work let by the board of supervisors where the contract price exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), the board may contract so as to provide for making partial payments to the contractor therefor as the work progresses. In no case shall the retained amount of such partial payments be less than two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the value of the work done and material used in the performance of the contracts, such value to be estimated by some competent person employed by the board to superintend such work, and not until the superintendent shall furnish to the board such estimate, in writing, on his oath as to the correctness of such estimate, which estimate, with the oath annexed thereto, shall be filed with and recorded in the minutes of the board; provided, however, the amount retained by the prime contractor from each payment due the subcontractor shall not exceed the percentage withheld by the board of supervisors from the prime contractors. Before such person employed by the board shall enter upon the discharge of the duty of supervising such work, and before he shall furnish any estimate as to the value of the work done, he shall enter into bond in such penalty as may be fixed by the board, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, and conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as superintendent of such work, which bond shall be filed and preserved by the board, and shall be liable to suit thereon in the name of the county, for any misfeasance or malfeasance on the part of such superintendent touching the performance of his duties. The board shall not be bound by the estimate of such superintendent, nor shall the making of any partial payments on any public work, as above provided, be construed as an acceptance of the work and materials so inspected by such superintendent. The board shall not make the final payment on any such works or building without first having the same inspected as a whole and accepted by a committee of the board, as hereinbefore provided, and until the specifications are complied with and the work completed.

The board of supervisors may make partial payments for the work done and materials used in performance of all contracts for public buildings and public works upon certification in writing to the board by the architect or engineer on the project; and on all such contracts for work done and materials used in performance of said contracts a percentage of not less than two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of each estimate thereon paid shall be retained until final acceptance of such project.

On any contract as described in this section, except for a contract for building or repairing a bridge or doing any work on a public road, of which the total amount is Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) or greater, ten percent (10%) shall be retained until the work is at least fifty percent (50%) complete, on schedule and satisfactory in the architect’s and/or engineer’s opinion. At such time fifty percent (50%) of that retainage shall be returned to the prime contractor for distribution to the appropriate subcontractors and suppliers who are on schedule and performing satisfactorily, in the opinion of the prime contractor. Thereafter, a five percent (5%) retainage shall be withheld.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 342; Laws, 1906, § 363; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3736; Laws, 1930, § 241; Laws, 1942, § 2919; Laws, 1904, ch. 141; Laws, 1924 ch. 237; Laws, 1968 ch. 289, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 454, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 406, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984, and shall apply only to contracts executed on or after July 1, 1984.

§ 19-13-17.
Purchase of road equipment.

[With regard to any county that is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

A board of supervisors purchasing tractors, trucks and other machinery or equipment for constructing, reconstructing and maintaining the public roads shall not pay, or agree or contract to pay, more therefor than the then prevailing manufacturer’s retail list price at the factory, plus freight and sales tax, any federal excise tax, and a reasonable service and assembly charge. The board may provide for the payment of all or any portion of such price over the useful life of the property as determined according to the most recent asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines; provided, however, that no installment contract described in this sentence may be executed by the board during the last year of the board’s term of office. All such deferred payments shall be represented by notes of the county, or a separate road district or supervisors district thereof, as the case may be, to be dated at or after the time of delivery of the machinery, bearing interest at a rate not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-105, from date until paid, and payable to the seller of the machinery, or the purchaser of the notes, out of the road fund of the county or district. All such notes for any purchase shall be payable on the fifteenth day of June or the fifteenth day of December, the first to be payable not more than one (1) year after date. Said notes shall be signed by the president of the board, and countersigned by the clerk thereof, under the seal of the county. Said notes may be validated in the manner provided by law, and may be delivered to the seller of the machinery, or to any person who will purchase the same at a lower rate of interest than said seller is willing to accept, or at a like rate of interest plus a premium, any money received from a sale of such notes to be applied to the payment of the balance due on said machinery, and any surplus to be paid into the road fund of the county or district, as the case may be. On the first business day of each month in which any such note matures, the clerk shall docket the principal amount of such note, with interest thereon to maturity, as a claim against the county, in favor of the last known holder of such note, and the board shall allow the same at its regular meeting held that month without further presentation, proof or demand, to be paid as other claims in its proper order.

In all advertisements for bids for road machinery or equipment under this section, the board of supervisors shall insert in such advertisements a statement as to whether or not the road machinery or equipment purchased is to be paid for in cash, or is to be purchased upon installment payments as authorized herein. All indebtedness incurred under the provisions hereof may be incurred by the board without the necessity of calling an election thereon, receiving a petition therefor, or giving notice of the intention of the board to incur such indebtedness. However, no indebtedness shall be hereafter incurred under the provisions of this section which, when added to the amount of notes incurred hereunder which are then outstanding shall require the use in the retirement of such notes in any one (1) year of more than fifty percent (50%) of the amount available to the county, separate road district, or supervisors district, as the case may be, for the maintenance of roads and bridges for the preceding fiscal year. The amount available for the maintenance of roads and bridges shall be deemed to be the sum of the amounts produced by the county’s or district’s share of the state gasoline and motor vehicle privilege license tax, less that amount required by law to be set aside for the payment of bonds, together with the amount produced by the road and/or bridge ad valorem tax levy for such county or district, as the case may be. Nothing herein, however, shall be construed to invalidate any indebtedness previously incurred and now outstanding.

When any county, separate road district, or supervisors district has heretofore incurred, or shall hereafter incur an indebtedness under the provisions of this section for the purchase of road machinery or equipment, it shall be the duty of the chancery clerk of such county to deduct each month from the distribution of the state gasoline tax which would otherwise be paid to such county or district (but not from the amount required by law to be set aside for the payment of bonds) a proportionate amount of the sum which will be due as the principal of and interest upon the next installment to be paid on such indebtedness, it being the intention of this section to provide that if the indebtedness be payable in semiannual installments then there shall be set aside each month out of said distribution of state gasoline tax one-sixth ( 1/6) of the amount which will be necessary to pay the principal of and any interest upon the next installment to become due, and that a like method of computation shall be followed in all cases in determining the amount to be so set aside. All amounts so deducted under the provisions of this section shall be kept in a separate fund of the county, separate road district, or supervisors district, as the case may be, and shall be expended for no other purpose than the payment of the principal and interest of said indebtedness until the same be paid. Should said separate fund so created not be sufficient for the payment of the next maturing installment of principal and interest when the same becomes due, there shall be transferred thereto from the road and bridge fund such amount as will make the separate fund sufficient for the purpose.

If any person, firm, corporation or association, or any agent or employee thereof, shall willfully claim and receive any amount from any county, separate road district, or supervisors district, as the purchase price of, or as any installment upon the purchase price of, any road machinery or equipment where the provisions of this section have not been complied with, or if any member of the board of supervisors shall knowingly vote for the payment of any unauthorized claim for the purchase price, or any installment upon the purchase price, of any road machinery or equipment, then such person, firm, corporation, association or member of the board of supervisors, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding double the amount of such unauthorized claim, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2937, 2940-13; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 246 §§ 1, 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 247 § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 9, amended ch. 541, § 8; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 13; Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 5; Laws, 1995 ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1995).

§ 19-13-17.
Purchase of road equipment.

[With regard to any county that is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

A board of supervisors purchasing tractors, trucks and other machinery or equipment for constructing, reconstructing and maintaining the public roads may provide for the payment of all or any portion of the price thereof over the useful life of the property as determined according to the most recent asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines; provided, however, that no installment contract described in this sentence may be executed by the board during the last year of the board’s term of office. All such deferred payments shall be represented by notes of the county, to be dated at or after the time of delivery of the machinery, bearing interest at a rate not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-105, from date until paid, and payable to the seller of the machinery, or the purchaser of the notes, out of the road fund of the county. All such notes for any purchase shall be payable on June 15 or December 15, the first to be payable not more than one (1) year after date. Said notes shall be signed by the president of the board, and countersigned by the clerk thereof, under the seal of the county. Said notes may be validated in the manner provided by law, and may be delivered to the seller of the machinery, or to any person who will purchase the same at a lower rate of interest than said seller is willing to accept, or at a like rate of interest plus a premium, any money received from a sale of such notes to be applied to the payment of the balance due on said machinery, and any surplus to be paid into the road fund of the county. On the first business day of each month in which any such note matures, the clerk shall docket the principal amount of such note, with interest thereon to maturity, as a claim against the county, in favor of the last known holder of such note, and the board shall allow the same at its regular meeting held that month without further presentation, proof or demand, to be paid as other claims in its proper order.

In all advertisements for bids for road machinery or equipment under this section, the board of supervisors shall insert in such advertisements a statement as to whether or not the road machinery or equipment purchased is to be paid for in cash, or is to be purchased upon installment payments as authorized herein. All indebtedness incurred under the provisions hereof may be incurred by the board without the necessity of calling an election thereon, receiving a petition therefor, or giving notice of the intention of the board to incur such indebtedness. However, no indebtedness shall be hereafter incurred under the provisions of this section which, when added to the amount of notes incurred hereunder which are then outstanding shall require the use in the retirement of such notes in any one (1) year of more than fifty percent (50%) of the amount available to the county for the maintenance of roads and bridges for the preceding fiscal year. The amount available for the maintenance of roads and bridges shall be deemed to be the sum of the amounts produced by the county’s share of the state gasoline and motor vehicle privilege license tax, less that amount required by law to be set aside for the payment of bonds, together with the amount produced by the road and/or bridge ad valorem tax levy for such county. Nothing herein, however, shall be construed to invalidate any indebtedness previously incurred and now outstanding.

When any county has heretofore incurred, or shall hereafter incur an indebtedness under the provisions of this section for the purchase of road machinery or equipment, it shall be the duty of the chancery clerk as county treasurer to pay the principal of and interest upon the indebtedness in semiannual installments from the road maintenance and bridge funds.

If any person, firm, corporation or association, or any agent or employee thereof, shall willfully claim and receive any amount from any county as the purchase price of, or as any installment upon the purchase price of, any road machinery or equipment where the provisions of this section have not been complied with, then such person, firm, corporation or association shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding double the amount of such unauthorized claim or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2937, 2940-13; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 246 §§ 1, 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 247 § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 9, amended ch. 541, § 8; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 13; Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 5; Laws, 1995 ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1995).

§ 19-13-19.
Purchase of surplus road equipment from federal agencies.

The authority is hereby granted to boards of supervisors to purchase tractors, trucks and other machinery or equipment for use of the county or any road district of any county in constructing, reconstructing and maintaining public roads from any agency of the federal government authorized to sell and dispose of surplus property.

Such purchases may be made without first having advertised for bidders and without competitive bids having first been submitted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2940-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 476; Laws, 1956, ch. 182, §§ 1-3.

§ 19-13-21.
Repairs of road equipment.

The board of supervisors of any county which owns any tractor, truck, or other road machinery or equipment, or any district of which owns any such machinery or equipment, may at any time have the same repaired, or purchase necessary repair parts therefor, where it is necessary to use the machinery or equipment in constructing, reconstructing or maintaining the public roads, whether or not there is then a sufficient amount in the fund out of which the cost thereof must be paid to pay the same. The claim for the repairs or repair parts shall be allowed in due course when filed, and be paid in its proper order as other claims. However, if any repairs herein permitted to be made after the first day of July of the last year of the term of office of the members of the board making such repairs shall exceed the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), the repairs shall not be made unless and until the board of supervisors, or a majority of the members thereof, shall have authorized the making of the repairs at a regular meeting of the board, or a special meeting called for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2939; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 246, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 539, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 19-13-22.
Road maintenance agreements with certain taxpayers.

A county may, by resolution spread upon its minutes, enter into a road maintenance agreement with a taxpayer that is eligible for the reduced severance tax levied pursuant to Section 27-25-503(1)(c) or 27-25-703(1)(b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 533, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 19-13-23.
Presentation of claims against county for allowance.

Any person having a just claim against any county shall first file the same on or before the last day of the month for which such claim may be payable, with the clerk of the board of supervisors for presentation to the board for allowance, which said claim shall be properly dated and itemized, and shall be accompanied by any evidence of performance or delivery as required by Section 19-13-25. The claimant may amend said claim at any time before final rejection or allowance, and may appear before the board and submit further evidence or argument in support thereof, having a continuance for either or both of said purposes if desired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art. 34; 1871, § 1384; 1880, § 2175; 1892, § 292; 1906, § 311; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3684; 1930, § 253; 1942 §§ 9118-07, 2932; Laws, 1932, ch. 179; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 244 § 1, ch. 247, § 7, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 19-13-25.
Itemization of claims for sales of personal property.

All claims filed for allowance by a board of supervisors which are based upon a sale or sales of any personal property shall be sufficiently itemized to show in detail the kind, quantity and price of the articles sold. Claims covering the sale of lumber shall be itemized so as to show in detail the grade or grades thereof, the amount of each different size of lumber covered by said invoice or statement, together with the total number of feet of each different grade and size, and the price per thousand feet at which it is sold, stated separately for each different grade and size. Each itemized invoice or statement so filed shall be accompanied by either (1) a receipt, in like detail, properly dated, and signed by a public officer, agent or employee authorized to accept delivery of such property, or, (2) a bill of lading or shipping receipt issued by a common carrier making delivery of such property, the rules of which carrier require a receipt to be given by the consignee on delivery, or (3) an affidavit of the seller, his agent or employee, showing how, where, when, and to whom delivery of such property was made. Where an affidavit is filed as proof of delivery, if delivery was by mail, the affidavit must have attached thereto a post office registry or insurance receipt, and if delivery was made by car, truck, or other public or private conveyance or means, the affidavit must state the name and address of the party actually making the delivery, and the make and license number of any car or truck used therein, as well as the other matters above required. The person so mailing or making actual delivery of such property shall, for the purpose of making such affidavit only, be considered an agent or employee of the seller. It is expressly provided, however, that no claim not first filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be allowed until the seller has filed such claim in accordance with the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2933; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 244, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1973).

§ 19-13-27.
Docket of claims.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall be supplied with, and shall keep as a record of his office, a book to be styled “The Docket of Claims,” in which he shall enter monthly all demands, claims and accounts against the county presented to him during the month. The docket shall provide spaces for the name of the claimant, the number of the claim, the amount of the claim, and on what account. All demands, claims and accounts filed against the county shall be preserved by the clerk as a permanent record, and numbered to correspond with the warrants to be issued therefor, if allowed. Immediately upon being notified of any judgment being rendered against the county, the clerk shall docket the same as a claim for allowance and payment as provided by law. Any claimant who has filed a claim with the clerk of the board of supervisors in the manner provided in Section 19-13-25 whose said claim is not allowed because of the failure of such clerk to keep the docket of claims as herein required, shall be entitled to recover the amount of such claim from such clerk on his official bond. Failure of the clerk to keep the docket of claims as herein required shall render such clerk liable to the county in the amount of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and the Auditor of Public Accounts, upon information to the effect that such claims docket has not been kept, shall proceed immediately against such clerk for the collection of said penalty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 321; 1906, § 342; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3715; 1930, § 254; 1942, § 2934; Laws, 1938, ch. 317, 1940, chs. 253, 259; Laws, 1950, ch. 244, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1985.

§ 19-13-29.
Duties of clerk in receiving, filing and paying claims.

When claims against the county shall be presented to the clerk thereof, said clerk shall mark “filed” on each such claim, as of the date of presentation of same, and shall audit, number, and docket the same consecutively under the heading of each fund in the book of accounts required by Section 19-11-13 out of which the same shall be paid. The said clerk shall file the claims in like manner, and shall safely preserve the same as records of his office. Each year’s records shall be kept separate and begin with a new number for each year, and thence run in regular order for that year.

In issuing any warrant under order of the board of supervisors to pay any one of said claims so numbered and kept, said clerk shall enter the number of the claim and designate the fund against which allowed in the body of the warrant so that the claim may be easily found and identified, and so that possible duplication may be avoided.

For failure to perform any duty required of him herein, said clerk shall not be entitled to the compensation now provided by law for such duty, when performed, and the board of supervisors shall be prohibited from authorizing payment of the same to said clerk, but, instead, said board shall be authorized to employ a competent person to perform any duty which such clerk has failed to perform, either in his capacity as the clerk of the board or as the county auditor, and pay to such person the compensation now provided by law for such services, as aforesaid.

Any claim filed with the clerk on or before the last working day in the month prior to the next regular meeting of the board of supervisors at which claims are considered pursuant to Section 19-13-31 shall be so docketed as to be considered by the board of supervisors at such meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9118-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 247, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 19-13-31.
Disposition of claims.

At each regular meeting of the board, the claims docket shall be called and all claims then on file, not previously rejected or allowed, shall be passed upon in the order in which they are entered upon the docket. All claims found by the board to be illegal, and which cannot be made legal by amendment, shall be rejected or disallowed. All other claims shall be audited, and all those found proper upon due proof shall be allowed in the order in which they appear on the docket, whether or not there shall then be sufficient money in the several funds on which warrants must be drawn for their payment. Those claims as to which a continuance is requested by the claimant, and those found to be defective but which might be perfected by amendment shall be continued. When any claim is allowed by the board, it shall see that the claims docket correctly specifies the name of the claimant, the number of the claim, the amount allowed, and on what account. The president, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, of the board of supervisors shall check the claims docket at the close of each day’s business and shall verify the correctness of all docket entries made during the day. He shall sign his name at the end of the docket entries covering the day’s business, but it shall not be necessary that he sign the claims docket under each claim allowed or otherwise disposed of. The board shall enter an order on its minutes approving the demands and accounts allowed, but it shall only be necessary to refer to such demands and accounts by the numbers as they appear on the claims docket.

If the board shall reject any such claim in whole or in part, or refuse, when requested at a proper time, to pass finally thereon, the claimant may appeal to the circuit court, or may bring suit against the county on such claim. In either case, if the claimant recovers judgment and notifies the clerk of the board of supervisors, and if no appeal be taken to the Supreme Court, the board shall allow the same, and a warrant shall be issued therefor.

If the terms of the invoice provide a discount for payment in less than forty-five (45) days, boards of supervisors shall preferentially process it and use all diligence to obtain the savings by compliance with the invoice terms, if it would be cost effective.

In processing claims of vendors the board of supervisors shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 31-7-301, 31-7-305, 31-7-309, 31-7-311 and 31-7-313.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the chancery clerk may be authorized by an order of the board of supervisors entered upon its minutes, to issue pay certificates against the legal and proper fund for the salaries of officials and employees of the county or any department, office or official thereof without prior approval by the board of supervisors as required by this section for other claims, provided the amount of the salary has been previously entered upon the minutes by an order of the board of supervisors, or by inclusion in the current fiscal year budget and provided the payment thereof is otherwise in conformity with law and is the proper amount of a salaried employee and for hourly employees for the number of hours worked at the hourly rate approved on the minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, arts. 32, 34; 1871, §§ 1381, 1384; 1880, §§ 2159, 2175; 1892, §§ 292, 320; 1906, §§ 311, 341; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3684, 3714; 1930, §§ 253, 255; 1942, §§ 2932, 2935; Laws, 1932, chs. 179, 202; Laws, 1938, ch. 317; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 244, §§ 1, 4; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 10; Laws, 1989, ch. 358, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1989).

§ 19-13-33.
Certain allowances unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for the board of supervisors to allow a greater sum for any account, claim, or demand against the county than the amount actually due thereon, dollar for dollar, according to the legal or ordinary cash compensation for such services rendered, or for salaries or fees of officers, or for materials furnished, or to issue county warrants or orders upon such accounts, claims or demands, when allowed for more than the actual amount so allowed, dollar for dollar. Any illegal allowance by such board may be inquired into by the proper tribunal, upon legal proceedings for that purpose, whenever such matter may come into question in any case.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1382; 1880, § 2160; 1892, § 322; 1906, § 343; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3716; 1930, § 257; 1942, § 2942.

§ 19-13-35.
Penalty for unauthorized appropriations.

If any person shall claim and receive from the board of supervisors of a county any fee or compensation not authorized by law, or if a member of such board shall knowingly vote for the payment of any such unauthorized claim, or any appropriation not authorized by law, he shall be subject to indictment, and, on conviction, be fined not exceeding double the amount of such unlawful charge, or may be imprisoned in the county jail not more than three months, or be subject to both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1379; 1880, § 2161; 1892, § 323; 1906, § 344; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3717; 1930, § 258; 1942, § 2943.

§ 19-13-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14 § 74, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

[Codes, 1871, § 1386; 1880, § 2177; 1892, § 325; 1906, § 346; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3719; 1930, § 259; 1942, § 2944; Laws, 1974, ch. 444, §§ 1-3]

§ 19-13-39.
How member may avoid liability.

Any member of the board of supervisors may have his vote, on any question before the board, recorded on the minutes of the board at the time of such vote, and a member who voted against any unauthorized appropriation of money shall not be liable therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1387; 1880, § 2178; 1892, § 319; 1906, § 340; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3713; 1930, § 260; 1942, § 2945.

§ 19-13-41.
Supervisors to furnish printed blank warrants.

The board of supervisors of each county shall provide printed warrants, with proper blanks, bound in book form, with a sufficient blank margin, to be used in drawing money out of the county treasury, and such warrants, so printed and bound, as may be needed to draw money out of the school fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 31; 1871, § 1380; 1880, § 2169; 1892, § 308; 1906, § 327; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3700; 1930, § 261; 1942, § 2946.